Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5875HV (2) 91 lh/ns H.F. 2638 Section 1. Section 22.7, subsection 11, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) The last date the individual, 3 who resigned from or was discharged by the government body, 4 performed work or actively carried out essential functions 5 of the position, regardless of whether the information is 6 contained in a written document, contract, agreement, or 7 arrangement. 8 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) The amount of moneys and public 9 benefits provided to the individual for any continuation of 10 pay, severance, or other compensation or benefits in excess of 11 the amounts owed for work performed by the individual prior 12 to the individualâs last day as an employee, contractor, or 13 appointee for the government body, regardless of whether the 14 information is contained in a written document, contract, 15 agreement, or arrangement. 16